New Jersey, session 221, A314.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Transportation, in conjunction with the New Jersey Transit Corporation and the Department of Human Services, shall conduct a review of current infrastructure design practices for new and rehabilitated public highways and public transportation projects, as those terms are defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-3).  Upon completion of the review, the Department of Transportation shall adopt new and revised design practices that implement design elements and result in infrastructure improvement projects that promote the ability of individuals with physical disabilities to travel independently. b.    The Department of Transportation, in conjunction with the New Jersey Transit Corporation and the Department of Human Services, shall conduct a study of nationwide best practices that identifies ways to operate public roadway facilities, public transportation services, and any mobility programs operated by or funded under the Department of Human Services in a manner that makes transportation services and mobility programs more accessible for individuals with physical disabilities. c.     The Department of Transportation shall encourage regional and local entities that apply for funding through the local aid program, pursuant to section 25 of P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-25), to adopt comparable design policies and best practices that are consistent with the measures adopted at the State level pursuant to subsection a. and subsection b. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.